Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.175

Control of mosquitoes—Declaration that owner is responsible.

A board established pursuant to RCW 17.28.110 may adopt, by resolution, a policy declaring that the control of mosquitoes within the district is the responsibility of the owner of the land from which the mosquitoes originate. To protect the public health or welfare, the board may, in accordance with policies and standards established by the board following a public hearing, adopt a regulation requiring owners of land within the district to perform such acts as may be necessary to control mosquitoes.

[ 1990 c 300 s 2.]